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DTC B0 138/72 Short in P/T Squib LH Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The P/T squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTCB0 138/72 is recordedwhenaB+short isdetected in theP/TsquibLHcircuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0138/72
SShort inP/TsquibLHcircuit (toB+)
SP/TsquibLHmalfunction
SAirbagsensorassemblymalfunction

SSeatbeltpretensionerLH(P/TsquibLH)
SAirbagsensorassembly
SFloorNo. 1 wire
SDashwire (Benchseat)

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−571.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2 Check seat type.

CHECK:
Confirm that the type of the front seat.
OK:

A: Separate seat
B: Bench seat

B Go to step 6.

A
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3CheckfloorNo. 1 wire (P/TsquibLHcircuit).

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebattery,andwait
at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a)Turn the ignitionswitch toON.
(b)Measure thevoltagebetween thebodygroundandPL+

of the floorNo. 1 wireconnectoron theseatbeltpreten-
sioner LH (P/T squib LH) side.

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NGRepairor replace floorNo. 1 wire.

OK
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4 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect PL+ and PL− of the floor No.

1 wire connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T
squib LH) side.

(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 138/72 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 138/72maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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5 Check P/T squib LH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)

connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 138/72 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 138/72maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace seat belt pretensioner LH
(P/T squib LH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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6 Check P/T squib LH circuit.

PREPARATION:
Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and wait
at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PL+

of the connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T
squib LH) side between the airbag sensor assembly and
the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH).

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Go to step 9.

OK
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7 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(d) Using a service wire, connect PL+ and PL− of the connec-

tor on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH) side
between the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt
pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH).

(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B0138/72 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0138/72 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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8 Check P/T squib LH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)

connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B0138/72 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0138/72 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace seat belt pretensioner LH
(P/T squib LH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.



H21548
AB0119 H08394 H21717

P/T Squib LH
Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

PL+

Floor No. 1 Wire

(−) (+)

ON

� �

Dash Wire

DI−602
−DIAGNOSTICS SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

9 Check floor No. 1 wire.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the floor No. 1 wire connector from the dash

wire.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal to the battery, and wait

at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PL+

of the floor No. 1wire connector on the seat belt preten-
sioner LH (P/T squib LH) side.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace floor No. 1 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.


